Washington statutes.
RCW 1.50.005

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that persons who donate organs help save the lives and promote the well-being of others in a manner that demonstrates the noblest side of human nature. Many families and friends of both the donors and the donees may want to remember the special act of donation in a way that honors the memory of the donor and encourages donation by others in the future.

To recognize the special kindness of those who donate their organs, the legislature establishes the Washington gift of life award.

[ 1999 c 264 s 1; 1998 c 59 s 1.]